Nevada, session 83, SB401.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 279.439 is hereby amended to read as follows:
279.439 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsections 2, 3
and 4,] this section, a redevelopment plan adopted on or after
January 1, 1991, and any amendments to the plan must terminate not
later than 30 years after the date on which the original
redevelopment plan is adopted.
-
*SB401*

– 2 –
2. If a redevelopment area includes any real property conveyed
by the Federal Government which contains an abandoned mine or
milling operation with open pits, large volumes of mine overburden
and tailings piles and mill facility foundations, or a hazardous level
of contaminants, a redevelopment plan adopted on or after
January 1, 1991, and any amendments to the plan must terminate not
later than 45 years after the date of the conveyance of the real
property if:
(a) Within 15 years after the date on which the original
redevelopment plan is adopted, the State enters into one or more
agreements, with respect to the real property conveyed by the
Federal Government, for mine remediation and reclamation; and
(b) Before entering into any agreement for mine remediation and
reclamation, the State consults with the legislative body of the
community in which the real property is located.
3. Except for a redevelopment area described in subsection 2, a
redevelopment plan, and any amendments to the plan, adopted on or
after January 1, 1991, by an agency of a county whose population is
700,000 or more or a city whose population is 220,000 or more but
less than 500,000 located in a county whose population is 700,000
or more that meets the requirement of subsection 4 must terminate
not later than 45 years after the date on which the original
redevelopment plan is adopted.
4. A redevelopment plan, and any amendments to the plan,
may terminate on the date prescribed by subsection 3 only if the
legislative body adopts an extension of the redevelopment plan by
ordinance.
5. Except for a redevelopment area described in subsection 2,
a redevelopment plan, and any amendments to the plan, adopted
on or after January 1, 1991, by an agency of a city whose
population is 150,000 or more located in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more but less than 700,000 must
terminate not later than 50 years after the date on which the
original redevelopment plan is adopted.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB401*